Utah statutes.
59-12-1102.   Base -- Rate -- Imposition of tax -- Distribution of revenue
-- Administration -- Commission requirement to retain an amount to be
deposited into the Qualified Emergency Food Agencies Fund -- Enactment or
repeal of tax -- Effective date -- Notice requirements.
(1) (a) (i)  Subject to Subsections (2) through (6), and in addition to any
other tax authorized by this chapter, a county may impose by ordinance a
county option sales and use tax of .25%  upon the transactions described in
Subsection 59-12-103(1).
(ii)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(a)(i), a county may not impose a tax
under this section on the sales and uses described in Section 59-12-104 to the
extent the sales and uses are exempt from taxation under Section 59-12-104.
(b)  For purposes of this Subsection (1), the location of a transaction shall
be determined in accordance with Sections 59-12-211 through 59-12-215.
(c)  The county option sales and use tax under this section shall be imposed:
(i)  upon transactions that are located within the county, including
transactions that are located within municipalities in the county; and
(ii)  except as provided in Subsection (1)(d) or (5), beginning on the first
day of January:
(A)  of the next calendar year after adoption of the ordinance imposing the
tax if the ordinance is adopted on or before May 25; or
(B)  of the second calendar year after adoption of the ordinance imposing the
tax if the ordinance is adopted after May 25.
(d)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(c)(ii), the county option sales and use
tax under this section shall be imposed:
(i)  beginning January 1, 1998, if an ordinance adopting the tax imposed on or
before September 4, 1997; or
(ii)  beginning January 1, 1999, if an ordinance adopting the tax is imposed
during 1997 but after September 4, 1997.
(2) (a)  Before imposing a county option sales and use tax under Subsection
(1), a county shall  hold two public hearings on separate days in
geographically diverse locations in the county.
(b) (i)  At least one of the hearings required by Subsection (2)(a) shall have
a starting time of no earlier than 6 p.m.
(ii)  The earlier of the hearings required by Subsection (2)(a) shall be no
less than seven days after the day the first advertisement required by
Subsection (2)(c) is published.
(c) (i)  Before holding the public hearings required by Subsection (2)(a), the
county shall advertise:
(A)  its intent to adopt a county option sales and use tax;
(B)  the date, time, and location of each public hearing; and
(C)  a statement that the purpose of each public hearing is to obtain public
comments regarding the proposed tax.
(ii)  The advertisement shall be published:
(A)  in a newspaper of general circulation in the county once each week for
the two weeks preceding the earlier of the two public hearings; and
(B)  in accordance with Section 45-1-101 for two weeks preceding the earlier
of the two public hearings.
(iii)  The advertisement described in Subsection (2)(c)(ii)(A) shall be no
less than 1/8 page in size, and the type used shall be no smaller than 18
point and surrounded by a 1/4-inch border.
(iv)  The advertisement described in Subsection (2)(c)(ii)(A) may not be
placed in that portion of the newspaper where legal notices and classified
advertisements appear.
(v)  In accordance with Subsection (2)(c)(ii)(A), whenever possible:
(A)  the advertisement shall appear in a newspaper that is published at least
five days a week, unless the only newspaper in the county is published less
than five days a week; and
(B)  the newspaper selected shall be one of general interest and readership in
the community, and not one of limited subject matter.
(d)  The adoption of an ordinance imposing a county option sales and use tax
is subject to a local referendum election and shall be conducted as provided
in Title 20A, Chapter 7, Part 6, Local Referenda - Procedures.
(3) (a)  Subject to Subsection (5), if the aggregate population of the
counties imposing a county option sales and use tax under Subsection (1) is
less than 75% of the state population, the tax levied under Subsection (1)
shall be distributed to the county in which the tax was collected.
(b)  Subject to Subsection (5), if the aggregate population of the counties
imposing a county option sales and use tax under Subsection (1) is greater
than or equal to 75% of the state population:
(i)  50% of the tax collected under Subsection (1) in each county shall be
distributed to the county in which the tax was collected; and
(ii)  except as provided in Subsection (3)(c), 50% of the tax collected under
Subsection (1) in each county shall be distributed proportionately among all
counties imposing the tax, based on the total population of each county.
(c)  Except as provided in Subsection (5), the amount to be distributed
annually to a county under Subsection (3)(b)(ii), when combined with the
amount distributed to the county under Subsection (3)(b)(i), does not equal at
least $75,000, then:
(i)  the amount to be distributed annually to that county under Subsection
(3)(b)(ii) shall be increased so that, when combined with the amount
distributed to the county under Subsection (3)(b)(i), the amount distributed
annually to the county is $75,000; and
(ii)  the amount to be distributed annually to all other counties under
Subsection (3)(b)(ii) shall be reduced proportionately to offset the
additional amount distributed under Subsection (3)(c)(i).
(d)  The commission shall establish rules to implement the distribution of the
tax under Subsections (3)(a), (b), and (c).
(4) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (4)(b) or (c), a tax authorized
under this part shall be administered, collected, and enforced in accordance
with:
(i)  the same procedures used to administer, collect, and enforce the tax
under:
(A)  Part 1, Tax Collection; or
(B)  Part 2, Local Sales and Use Tax Act; and
(ii)  Chapter 1, General Taxation Policies.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (4)(a), a tax under this part is not subject
to Subsections 59-12-205(2) through (6).
(c)  Notwithstanding Subsection (4)(a), the fee charged by the commission
under Section 59-12-206 shall be based on the distribution amounts resulting
after:
(i)  the applicable distribution calculations under Subsection (3) have been
made; and
(ii)  the commission retains the amount required by Subsection (5).
(5) (a)  Beginning on July 1, 2009, the commission shall calculate and retain
a portion of the sales and use tax collected under this part as provided in
this Subsection (5).
(b)  For a county that imposes a tax under this part, the commission shall
calculate a percentage each month by dividing the sales and use tax collected
under this part for that month within the boundaries of that county by the
total sales and use tax collected under this part for that month within the
boundaries of all of the counties that impose a tax under this part.
(c)  For a county that imposes a tax under this part, the commission shall
retain each month an amount equal to the product of:
(i)  the percentage the commission determines for the month under Subsection
(5)(b) for the county; and
(ii)  $6,354.
(d)  The commission shall deposit an amount the commission retains in
accordance with this Subsection (5) into the Qualified Emergency Food Agencies
Fund created by Section 9-4-1409.
(e)  An amount the commission deposits into the Qualified Emergency Food
Agencies Fund shall be expended as provided in Section 9-4-1409.
(6) (a)  For purposes of this Subsection (6):
(i)  "Annexation" means an annexation to a county under Title 17, Chapter 2,
Annexation to County.
(ii)  "Annexing area" means an area that is annexed into a county.
(b) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (6)(c) or (d), if, on or after July
1, 2004, a county enacts or repeals a tax under this part:
(A) (I)  the enactment shall take effect as provided in Subsection (1)(c); or
(II)  the repeal shall take effect on the first day of a calendar quarter; and
(B)  after a 90-day period beginning on the date the commission receives
notice meeting the requirements of Subsection (6)(b)(ii) from the county.
(ii)  The notice described in Subsection (6)(b)(i)(B) shall state:
(A)  that the county will enact or repeal a tax under this part;
(B)  the statutory authority for the tax described in Subsection
(6)(b)(ii)(A);
(C)  the effective date of the tax described in Subsection (6)(b)(ii)(A); and
(D)  if the county enacts the tax described in Subsection (6)(b)(ii)(A), the
rate of the tax.
(c) (i)  The enactment of a tax shall take effect on the first day of the
first billing period:
(A)  that begins after the effective date of the enactment of the tax; and
(B)  if the billing period for the transaction begins before the effective
date of the enactment of the tax under Subsection (1).
(ii)  The repeal of a tax shall take effect on the first day of the last
billing period:
(A)  that began before the effective date of the repeal of the tax; and
(B)  if the billing period for the transaction begins before the effective
date of the repeal of the tax imposed under Subsection (1).
(d) (i)  If a tax due under this chapter on a catalogue sale is computed on
the basis of sales and use tax rates published in the catalogue, an enactment
or repeal of a tax described in Subsection (6)(b)(i) takes effect:
(A)  on the first day of a calendar quarter; and
(B)  beginning 60 days after the effective date of the enactment or repeal
under Subsection (6)(b)(i).
(ii)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commission may by rule define the term "catalogue sale."
(e) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (6)(f) or (g), if, for an annexation
that occurs on or after July 1, 2004, the annexation will result in the
enactment or repeal of a tax under this part for an annexing area, the
enactment or repeal shall take effect:
(A)  on the first day of a calendar quarter; and
(B)  after a 90-day period beginning on the date the commission receives
notice meeting the requirements of Subsection (6)(e)(ii) from the county that
annexes the annexing area.
(ii)  The notice described in Subsection (6)(e)(i)(B) shall state:
(A)  that the annexation described in Subsection (6)(e)(i) will result in an
enactment or repeal of a tax under this part for the annexing area;
(B)  the statutory authority for the tax described in Subsection
(6)(e)(ii)(A);
(C)  the effective date of the tax described in Subsection (6)(e)(ii)(A); and
(D)  the rate of the tax described in Subsection (6)(e)(ii)(A).
(f) (i)  The enactment of a tax shall take effect on the first day of the
first billing period:
(A)  that begins after the effective date of the enactment of the tax; and
(B)  if the billing period for the transaction begins before the effective
date of the enactment of the tax under Subsection (1).
(ii)  The repeal of a tax shall take effect on the first day of the last
billing period:
(A)  that began before the effective date of the repeal of the tax; and
(B)  if the billing period for the transaction begins before the effective
date of the repeal of the tax imposed under Subsection (1).
(g) (i)  If a tax due under this chapter on a catalogue sale is computed on
the basis of sales and use tax rates published in the catalogue, an enactment
or repeal of a tax described in Subsection (6)(e)(i) takes effect:
(A)  on the first day of a calendar quarter; and
(B)  beginning 60 days after the effective date of the enactment or repeal
under Subsection (6)(e)(i).
(ii)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commission may by rule define the term "catalogue sale."
